fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-askekinw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - askêkinw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, fresh rawhide AEW NI3
     askêkin+N+I+Sg: askêkin
     askêkin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nitaskêkin
     askêkin+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kitaskêkin
     askêkin+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nitaskêkinonân
     askêkin+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kitaskêkinonaw
     askêkin+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kitaskêkinowâw
     askêkin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: otaskêkin
     askêkin+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: otaskêkinowâw
     askêkin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: otaskêkinoyiw

     askêkin+N+I+Pl: askêkinwa
     askêkin+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nitaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kitaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitaskêkinonâna
     askêkin+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kitaskêkinonawa
     askêkin+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kitaskêkinowâwa
     askêkin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: otaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: otaskêkinowâwa
     askêkin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: otaskêkinoyiwa

     askêkin+N+I+Loc: askêkinohk
     askêkin+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nitaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kitaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nitaskêkinonâhk
     askêkin+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kitaskêkinonâhk
     askêkin+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kitaskêkinowâhk
     askêkin+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: otaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: otaskêkinowâhk
     askêkin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otaskêkinoyihk

     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [askêkinos,         askêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicaskêkinos,       nicaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicaskêkinos,       kicaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicaskêkinosinân,   nicaskêkinosisinân]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicaskêkinosinaw,   kicaskêkinosisinaw]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicaskêkinosiwâw,   kicaskêkinosisiwâw]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [ocaskêkinos,        ocaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [ocaskêkinosiwâw,    ocaskêkinosisiwâw]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [ocaskêkinosiyiw,    ocaskêkinosisiyiw]

     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:          [askêkinosa,       askêkinosisa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicaskêkinosa,     nicaskêkinosisa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicaskêkinosa,     kicaskêkinosisa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicaskêkinosinâna, nicaskêkinosisinâna]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicaskêkinosinawa, kicaskêkinosisinawa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicaskêkinosiwâwa, kicaskêkinosisiwâwa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:    [ocaskêkinosa,      ocaskêkinosisa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:    [ocaskêkinosiwâwa,  ocaskêkinosisiwâwa]
     askêkin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [ocaskêkinosiyiwa,  ocaskêkinosisiyiwa]
